Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2853.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 37, chapter 2, article 17, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 37-620.04, to read: START_STATUTE37-620.04. Vesting of concurrent juvenile delinquency jurisdiction in the United States over certain military lands A. Concurrent Juvenile delinquency jurisdiction over any lands in this state heretofore reserved from public domain or acquired by the United States as identified in subsection D of this section, and any additions made to such lands, is hereby vested in the United States on completion of the conditions set forth in subsection B of this section, except that the jurisdiction of this state over such lands shall continue. B. Concurrent Juvenile delinquency jurisdiction vests as to the lands in each area identified in subsection D of this section when the United States submits to the governor of this state a formal written request for concurrent juvenile delinquency jurisdiction accompanied by a satisfactory legal description and plat of the area, and on approval by the governor granting concurrent jurisdiction the legal description and plat shall be filed by the governor with the county recorder of each county in which the land is situated.  This state may withdraw jurisdiction over any land or area three years after written notification by the governor to the United States secretary of defense. C. The concurrent Juvenile delinquency jurisdiction hereby vested continues only as long as the United States continues to own or control the lands within those areas.  In the case of any lands included within the boundaries of the areas set forth in subsection D of this section that are not owned or controlled by the United States, the jurisdiction does not change by operation of this section. D. The lands subject to this section are all those lands that are owned or controlled by the United States and that are now or hereafter included within the exterior boundaries of Lands administered by the United States department of defense, or its successor land management agency, consisting of: 1. tHE fORT HUACHUCA ARMY BASE. 2. tHE yUMA PROVING GROUND. 3. tHE CAMP nAVAJO ARMY BASE. 4. The Marine corps air station Yuma. 5. The luke air force base, 6. The Davis-Monthan air force base. 7. The barry M. Goldwater range.END_STATUTE